Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS chapter 419C.
SECTION 2. (1) As soon as practicable after a  youth or adjudicated youth is taken into
custody under this chapter or, if the youth or  adjudicated youth is not taken into custody,
at the point of intake,  a county juvenile department shall ensure that the youth or adjudi-
cated youth is screened to determine whether the youth or adjudicated  youth is a victim of
sex trafficking. If the screening indicates that the youth  or adjudicated youth is or has been
a victim of sex trafficking, the screener shall immediately report  the suspected sex traf-
ficking as required under ORS 419B.010 and the county juvenile  department shall ensure that
the youth or adjudicated  youth is referred to appropriate resources, including access to a
special advocate.
(2) The Department of Justice:
(a) In consultation with the advisory  committee appointed by the department under ORS
147.480, the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Youth  Authority, shall maintain
and make available to each county juvenile department a  regularly updated list of referral
resources.
(b) In consultation with the  advisory committee appointed by the Department of Justice
under ORS 147.480, shall develop and provide training on  the use of a standardized screening
tool required to be used by a county juvenile department  in carrying out the county juvenile
department’s duties under this section.
(3) Each county juvenile department shall ensure that all staff of the  county juvenile
department who work directly with youths or adjudicated  youths complete the screening tool
training developed by the Department of Justice under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Adjudicated youth” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419A.004.
(b) “State agency” means any state officer, board, commission, bureau or department,
or division thereof, in the executive branch of state government.
(c) “Youth” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419A.004.
(2)(a) The Department of Justice, in consultation with the advisory committee  appointed
by the department under ORS  147.480, shall develop a one-hour virtual training on sex traf-
ficking.
Enrolled Senate Bill 745 (SB 745-A) Page 1
(b) The department shall make the training developed  under this subsection available at
no cost  to state agencies and county juvenile departments that work with youths and adju-
dicated youths.
(3) A state  agency shall ensure that all staff of the state agency who work with youths
and adjudicated youths complete the training developed under subsection (2)  of this section
at least once every two years.
(4) A county juvenile department shall ensure  that all staff of the county juvenile de-
partment who work with  youths and adjudicated youths complete the training developed
under subsection (2) of this section at least once every two years.
SECTION 4. No later than December 31, 2025, the  advisory committee appointed by the
Department of Justice under ORS 147.480 shall submit a  report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human services, in the  manner described in ORS
192.245, describing:
(1) How many screenings under section 2 of this 2023 Act were  conducted between Jan-
uary 1, 2024, and December 1, 2025;
(2) The number of victims of sex trafficking who were identified as  a result of the
screenings described in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) The types of resources to which the victims described in subsection (2) of this  section
were referred; and
(4) Any gaps  in resources available to victims of sex trafficking that were identified by
the advisory committee.
SECTION 5. (1) No later than January 1, 2024, the Department of  Justice shall make the
referral resource list, screening tool and training described in section 2 of this 2023 Act
available to county juvenile departments.
(2) No later than July 1, 2024, a county juvenile department shall ensure that all staff of
the county juvenile department who work directly with youths and adjudicated youths have
completed the screening tool training  developed by the Department of Justice under section
2 of this 2023 Act.
(3) No later  than January 1, 2025, the Department of Justice shall develop and begin
providing the training described in section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(4) No later than January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter, state agencies and
county juvenile departments shall ensure  that employees described in section 3 (3) and (4)
of this 2023 Act have  completed the training developed by the Department of Justice under
section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6.
Sections 4 and 5 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 7. (1)(a) Section 2 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2024.
(b) Section 3 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Department of Justice, the advisory committee appointed by the department  un-
der ORS 147.480, the Department of Human Services, the  Oregon Youth Authority and a
county juvenile department may take any action before the operative dates specified  in sub-
section (1) of this section that is necessary  for the departments, the advisory committee or
the authority to exercise, on and after the operative dates specified in subsection  (1) of this
section, the duties, functions and powers conferred on the departments, the advisory com-
mittee and the authority by sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2023 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 745 (SB 745-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate March 15, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 745 (SB 745-A) Page 3